Hawaii statutes.
SUBTITLE 5.
AQUATIC RESOURCES AND

WILDLIFE

Note

Subtitle heading
amended by L 1981, c 85, §10.

CHAPTER
187

GENERAL
PROVISIONS RELATING TO AQUATIC RESOURCES

AND
WILDLIFE

REPEALED. L 1986, c 275, §1.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next